Hawaii statutes.
§572-6 Application; license; limitations.
To secure a license to marry, the persons applying for the license shall appear
personally before an agent authorized to grant marriage licenses and shall file
with the agent an application in writing. The application shall be accompanied
by a statement signed and sworn to by each of the persons, setting forth: the
person's full name, date of birth, social security number, residence; their
relationship, if any; the full names of parents; and that all prior marriages
or civil unions, if any, other than an existing civil union between the persons
applying for the marriage license, have been dissolved by death or
dissolution. If all prior marriages or civil unions, other than an existing
civil union between the persons applying for the marriage license, have been
dissolved by death or dissolution, the statement shall also set forth the date
of death of the last prior spouse or the date and jurisdiction in which the
last decree of dissolution was entered. Any other information consistent with
the standard marriage certificate as recommended by the Public Health Service,
National Center for Health Statistics, may be requested for statistical or
other purposes, subject to approval of and modification by the department of
health; provided that the information shall be provided at the option of the
applicant and no applicant shall be denied a license for failure to provide the
information. The agent shall indorse on the application, over the agent's
signature, the date of the filing thereof and shall issue a license which shall
bear on its face the date of issuance. Every license shall be of full force
and effect for thirty days commencing from and including the date of issuance.
After the thirty-day period, the license shall become void and no marriage
ceremony shall be performed thereon.

It shall be the duty of every person, legally
authorized to grant licenses to marry, to immediately report the issuance of
every marriage license to the agent of the department of health in the district
in which the license is issued, setting forth all facts required to be stated
in such manner and on such form as the department may prescribe. [L 1929, c
104, §3; RL 1935, §4635; RL 1945, §12356; RL 1955, §323-6; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §19; HRS §572-6; am L 1969, c 191, §1; am L 1974, c 31, §1; gen ch 1985; am
L 1989, c 35, §1; am L 1997, c 293, §25; am L Sp 2013 2d, c 1, §5]

Attorney General Opinions

Power to waive three-day waiting period is vested in district
magistrates only, not in circuit court judges. Att. Gen. Op. 64-56.

Case Notes

Cited: 74 H. 530, 852 P.2d 44.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next